Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB303.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Small unmanned aircraft." An unmanned aircraft weighing less than 55 pounds, including the weight of anything attached to or carried by the aircraft.123456789101112131415161718192021 "Small unmanned aircraft system." A small unmanned aircraft and the equipment necessary for the safe and efficient operation of the aircraft.* * *"Unmanned aircraft." An aircraft or aerial vehicle that is operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft or vehicle.* * *Section 2. Section 2308(a)(7) of Title 34 is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 2308. Unlawful devices and methods.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in this title, it is unlawful for any person to hunt or aid, abet, assist or conspire to hunt any game or wildlife through the use of:* * *(7) A vehicle or conveyance of any kind or its attachment propelled by other than manpower. Nothing in this subsection shall pertain to any of the following:* * *(iii) A small unmanned aircraft system if the operator has been issued a wildlife recovery permit granted by the commission and the small unmanned aircraft system is used solely by the permittee for the recovery of harvested wildlife when no firearm or implement of taking is possessed by any participant involved in the recovery. This subparagraph shall not be construed to authorize the hunting of any live game or wildlife observed or located through the use of an unmanned aircraft system if a period of less than 24 hours has 20250SB0303PN0237 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 elapsed since the most recent observation or location event through the use of a small unmanned aircraft.* * *Section 3. Section 2311(a) of Title 34 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2311. Restrictions on recreational spotlighting.(a) Unlawful acts.--It is unlawful for any person to cast or to assist any other person in casting the rays of a spotlight, vehicle headlight or any other artificial light of any kind from any vehicle, watercraft, airborne craft or any attachment to such vehicles or crafts:(1) Upon any building at any time.(2) In any manner which frightens, excites or harasses any livestock, poultry or other farm animal.(3) To search for or locate for any purpose any game or wildlife anywhere within this Commonwealth, other than specified in paragraph (4), daily between the hours of 11 p.m. and sunrise on the following day.(4) To search for or locate for any purpose any game or wildlife anywhere within this Commonwealth at any time during the antlered deer rifle season and during the antlerless deer rifle season.(5) Upon photoelectric cell lights.[The provisions of this subsection shall not apply if it is proven that the headlights of a vehicle or conveyance were being used while traveling on a roadway in the usual way.](a.1) Exceptions.--The provisions of this section shall not apply to the use of:(1) The headlights of a vehicle or conveyance traveling on a roadway in the normal manner associated with traveling 20250SB0303PN0237 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at night or during inclement weather.(2) A spotlight mounted to a small unmanned aircraft system if the operator has been granted a wildlife recovery permit issued by the commission and the vehicle is used solely for the recovery of harvested wildlife when no firearm or implement of taking is possessed by any participant involved in the recovery. This paragraph shall not be construed to authorize the hunting of any live game or wildlife observed or located through the use of an unmanned aircraft if a period of less than 24 hours has elapsed since the most recent observation or location event through the use of a small unmanned aircraft.* * *Section 4. Chapter 29 of Title 34 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER EGAME OR WILDLIFE RECOVERY PERMITSSec.2971. Purpose of subchapter.2972. Definitions.2973. Application process.2974. Permits.2975. Small unmanned aircraft operation.2976. Field records.2977. Enforcement.§ 2971. Purpose of subchapter.The purpose of this subchapter is to provide for the issuance of game and wildlife recovery permits to authorize eligible applicants to assist in the recovery of game and wildlife lawfully harvested by other individuals using small unmanned 20250SB0303PN0237 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 aircraft systems.§ 2972. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Game or w ildlife recovery activity." The act of aiding, abetting, assisting or conspiring with another person, in any manner, to recover previously harvested game or wildlife using a small unmanned aircraft system."Game or wildlife recovery permit." A game or wildlife recovery permit issued in accordance with this subchapter."Permittee." An individual issued a game or wildlife recovery permit under this subchapter.§ 2973. Application process.(a) Form.--The commission shall develop and make available an application form for a game or wildlife recovery permit in accordance with this subchapter.(b) Application.--An individual may apply to the appropriate regional office of the commission for a game or wildlife recovery permit in the form and manner prescribed by the commission.(c) Contents.--An a pplication for a game or wildlife recovery permit must include:(1) The name, address, telephone number, customer identification number and date of birth of the applicant.(2) A copy of the applicant's remote pilot certificate issued under 14 CFR Pt. 107 (relating to small unmanned aircraft systems).(3) A copy of the financial liability insurance policy for the small unmanned aircraft system of the applicant.20250SB0303PN0237 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The remote identification number associated with each small unmanned aircraft system to be covered by the permit.(d) Fee.--The fee for a game or wildlife recovery permit shall be:(1) $100 for residents and nonresidents when used for commercial game or wildlife recovery activity.(2) $5 for individuals utilizing a small unmanned aircraft system for personal game or wildlife recovery activity.§ 2974. Per mits. (a) Permit required.--An individual must first obtain a game or wildlife recovery permit before engaging in any game or wildlife recovery activity.(b) Additional permits.--The issuance of a game or wildlife recovery permit to an individual does not diminish the obligation of the individual to obtain other applicable Federal, State or local permits.(c) State game lands.--Notwithstanding 58 Pa. Code § 135.41 (relating to State game lands), a game or wildlife recovery permit authorizes its holder to engage in game or wildlife recovery activities on lands designated as State game lands using a small unmanned aircraft system.(d) Conditions.--The initial and continued validity of a game or wildlife recovery permit is conditioned upon the permittee's:(1) Maintenance of a valid remote pilot certificate issued under 14 CFR Pt. 107 (relating to small unmanned aircraft systems).(2) Maintenance of financial liability insurance 20250SB0303PN0237 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 covering the operation of each unmanned aircraft system associated with the permit.(3) Maintenance and update of the remote identification number associated with each unmanned aircraft system associated with the permit.§ 2975. Sm all unmanned aircraft operation. (a) Compliance with law.--A permittee shall operate a small unmanned aircraft system used for a game or wildlife recovery activity in compliance with all applicable Federal, State and local law governing operation.(b) Remote identification broadcast.--A permittee shall cause a small unmanned aircraft system used in a game or wildlife recovery activity conducted under the permittee's game or wildlife recovery permit to continuously broadcast the equipment identification number during the game or wildlife recovery activity.(c) Firearms and implements capable of harvest.--A permittee shall ensure that the individuals participating in a game or wildlife recovery activity conducted under the permittee's game or wildlife recovery permit are not in possession of a firearm, bow, crossbow or other implement capable of harvesting game or wildlife during the game or wildlife recovery activity. Enforcement of this subsection shall be based on the standard of whether the permittee knew or should have known about the possession of the firearm, bow, crossbow or other implement.§ 2976. Field r ecords. (a) Maintenance and inspection.--(1) A permittee shall maintain and provide to the commission legible, accurate and complete field records of all game or wildlife recovery activities conducted under the 20250SB0303PN0237 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority of the game or wildlife recovery permit of the permittee.(2) T he field records must be maintained and made available for inspection in accordance with section 2906 (relating to records).(b) Form and contents.--The commission shall develop and make available a form to be used for the submittal of the field records described under paragraph (1), which must include the following information for each commercial guiding activity:(1) The name, address and customer identification number for each client.(2) The date of each game or wildlife recovery activity.(3) The quantity and species of game or wildlife recovered for each client. If the species recovered is an antlered white-tailed deer or elk, the field records must also provide the number of points for each antler.(4) The name and permit number of any additional game or wildlife recovery permittee that participates in the game or wildlife recovery activity.(c) Reports.--Field records must be submitted to the commission annually in accordance with section 2907 (relating to reports).§ 2977. Enforcement.(a) Prosecution.--A vi olation of this subchapter shall be prosecuted in accordance with section 2908 (relating to violations).(b) Permit.--The director may deny, revoke or suspend a game or wildlife recovery permit of a permittee for a violation of this subchapter or this title by the permittee or any subpermittee, upon written notice to the permittee.20250SB0303PN0237 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0303PN0237 - 9 - 1